Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,100
Fee or assessment; limitation.

No fee or assessment may be levied pursuant to section 46-299 for withdrawals from wells with a capacity of less than one hundred gallons per minute which are solely for domestic purposes as defined in section 46-613.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 45, § 3.